Utah statutes.
70A-3-418.   Payment or acceptance by mistake.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), if the drawee of a draft pays or accepts the draft and the drawee acted on the mistaken belief that payment of the draft had not been stopped pursuant to Section 70A-4-403, or the signature of the drawer of the draft was authorized, the drawee may recover the amount of the draft from the person to whom or for whose benefit payment was made or, in the case of acceptance, may revoke the acceptance.  Rights of the drawee under this subsection are not affected by failure of the drawee to exercise ordinary care in paying or accepting the draft.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), if an instrument has been paid or accepted by mistake and the case is not covered by Subsection (1), the person paying or accepting may, to the extent permitted by the law governing mistake and restitution, recover the payment from the person to whom or for whose benefit payment was made, or in the case of acceptance, may revoke the acceptance.

(3)  The remedies provided by Subsection (1) or (2) may not be asserted against a person who took the instrument in good faith and for value or who in good faith changed position in reliance on the payment or acceptance.  This subsection does not limit remedies provided by Section 70A-3-417 or 70A-4-407.

(4)  Notwithstanding Section 70A-4-215, if an instrument is paid or accepted by mistake and the payor or acceptor recovers payment or revokes acceptance under Subsection (1) or (2), the instrument is deemed not to have been paid or accepted and is treated as dishonored, and the person from whom payment is recovered has rights as a person entitled to enforce the dishonored instrument.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 237, 1993 General Session

